District of Columbia statutes.
47-2708

Construction.

Nothing in this subchapter shall be construed to excuse or release any person, firm or corporation, or property from the payment of any occupational or property tax, or any other tax imposed or levied by law. Neither shall anything herein be construed to obviate the application of any fraudulent or false advertisement statute of the District of Columbia to any person who may violate the same; nor shall anything herein be construed to prevent any prosecution for fraud, deceit, or larceny by trick; nor to in any way estop or hinder any remedy at law or in equity, or the right to cancel or estop any unconscionable bargain or fraudulent transaction.

Sept. 8, 1916, 39 Stat. 847, ch. 473, § 8
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
1981 Ed., § 47-2708.
1973 Ed., § 47-2208.